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DTC P011 5/22 Water Temp. Circuit Malfunction

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
A thermistor built into the water temp. sensor changes the resistance value according to the water tempera-
ture.
The structure of the sensor and connection to the engine ECU is the same as in the intake air temp. circuit
malfunction shown on page DI−28.
If the engine ECU detects the DTC P0115/22, it operates the fail safe function in which the water temperature
isassumed tobe80 ˚ C(176 ˚ F).

DTC No. DTC Detection Condition Trouble Area

SOpenorshort inwate r temp.sensorcircuit

P0115/22 Openorshort inwate r temp.sensorcircuit 0.5sec.ormore

SOpen orshort in watertemp. sensor circuit
SWater temp.sensorP0115/22 Open orshort in watertemp. sensor circuit 0.5 sec . or more Water temp . sensor

SEngineECU

HINT:
AfterconfirmingDTCP0115/22use thehand −held tester toconfirm thewater temp. fromCURRENTDATA.

Temperature Displayed Malfunction

− 40˚ C (− 40˚ F) Open circuit

140˚C (284˚F)ormore Short circuit

WIRING DIAGRAM

INSPECTION PROCEDURE
HINT:
S Read freeze framedatausinghand −held tester.Because freeze framerecords theengineconditions

when the malfunction is detected, when troubleshooting it is useful for determining whether the vehicle
was runningorstopped, theenginewarmedupornot, theair −fuel ratio leanor rich,etc.at the time
of the malfunction.

S IfDTC”P0105/31” (VacuumSensorCircuitMalfunction), ”P0110/24” (IntakeAirTemp.CircuitMalfunc-
tion), ”P0115/22” (Water Temp. Circuit Malfunction), ”P0120/41” (Throttle Position Sensor Circuit Mal-
function) are output simultaneously, E2 (Sensor Ground) may be open.
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When using hand−held tester

1 Connect the hand−held tester, and read value of water temperature.

PREPARATION:
(a) Connect the hand−held tester to the DLC3.
(b) Turn the ignition switch ON and push the hand−held tester main switch ON.
CHECK:
Read temperature value on the hand−held tester.
OK:

Same as actual water temperature
HINT:
S If there is open circuit, hand−held tester indicates − 40˚ C (− 40˚F).
S If there is short hand− held tester indicates 140˚ C (284˚F)  or more.

NG −40˚ C (−40˚ F) .... Go to step 2.
140˚ C (284˚ F) or more .... Go to step 4.

OK

Check for intermittent problem
(See page DI−4) .

2 Check for open in harness or engine ECU.

PREPARATION:
(a) Disconnect the water temp. sensor connector.
(b)Connectsensorwireharness terminals together.
(c)Turn the ignitionswitchON.
CHECK:
Read temperaturevalueon thehand −held tester.
OK:

Temperaturevalue: 140˚ C(284 ˚ F)ormore

OK Confirm good connection at sensor. If OK, re-
place water temp. sensor.

NG
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3 Check for open in harness or engine ECU.

PREPARATION:
(a) Remove the glove compartment door.
(b) Connect between terminals THW and E2 of engine ECU

connector.
HINT:
Water temperature sensor connector is disconnected. Before
checking, do a visual and contact pressure check for the engine
ECU connector (See page IN−19).
(c) Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Read temperaturevalueon thehand −held tester.
OK:

Temperaturevalue: 140˚ C(284 ˚ F)ormore

OK Open in harness between terminals E2 or THW,
repair or replace harness.

NG

Confirm good connection at engine ECU.
If OK, replace engine ECU.

4 Check for short in harness or engine ECU.

PREPARATION:
(a) Disconnect the water temp. sensor connector.
(b)Turn the ignitionswitchON.
CHECK:
Read temperaturevalueon thehand −held tester.
OK:

Temperaturevalue: − 40˚ C (− 40˚ F)

OK Replace water temp. sensor.

NG
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5 Check for short in harness or engine ECU.

PREPARATION:
(a) Remove the glove compartment door.
(b) Disconnect the E12 connector of engine ECU.
HINT:
Water temp. sensor connector is disconnected.
(c) Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Read temperature value on the hand−held tester.
OK:

Temperature value: − 40˚ C (− 40˚ F)

OK Repair or replace harness or connector.

NG

Check and replace engine ECU
(See page IN−1 9) .
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When not using hand−held tester

1 Check voltage between terminals THW and E2 of engine ECU connector.

PREPARATION:
(a) Remove the glove compartment door.
(b) Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Measure voltage between terminals THW and E2 of engine
ECU connecter.
OK:

Water Temperature Voltage

20˚ C (68˚ F) (Engine is cool) 0.5 − 3.4 V

80˚ C (176˚ F) (Engine is hot) 0.2 − 1.0 V

OK Check for intermittent problems
(See page DI−4) .

NG

2 Check water temp. sensor.

PREPARATION:
Disconnect the water temp. sensor connecter.
CHECK:
Measure resistance between terminals.
OK:

Resistance is within Acceptable Zone on chart.

Water Temperature Resistance

20˚C (68˚F) (Engine is cool) 2 − 3 k�

80˚C (176˚F) (Engine is hot) 0.2 − 0.4 k�

NG Replace water temp. sensor.

OK
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3 Check for open and short in harness and connector between engine ECU and
water temp. sensor (See page IN−1 9) .

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

Check and replace engine ECU
(See page IN−1 9) .


